District of Columbia statutes.
34-206

“Electric plant” defined.

The term “electric plant” when used in this subtitle means the material, equipment, and property owned and used, or to be used, by the electric company for or in connection with the transmission or distribution of electricity in the District of Columbia to a retail electric customer.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 975, ch. 150, § 8, par. 1
May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-107, § 201(b)(4), 47 DCR 1091
Public utility environmental impact statement, “action” defined, see § 34-
This section is referenced in § 34-1311.01 and § 34-2602.
1981 Ed., § 43-214.
1973 Ed., § 43-114.
D.C. Law 13-107 rewrote this section which formerly provided: “The term ‘electric plant’ when used in Chapters 1-10 of this title includes all engines, boilers, dynamos, generators, storage batteries, converters, motors, transformers, cables, wires, poles, lamps, meters, easements, real estate, fixtures, and personal property, materials, apparatus, and devices of every kind operated, owned, used or to be used for or in connection with or to facilitate the generation, transmission, distribution, sale, or furnishing of electricity for light, heat, or power, and any conduits, ducts, or other devices, materials, apparatus, or property for containing, holding, or carrying electrical conductors used or to be used wholly or in part for the transmission of electricity for light, heat, or power, except where electricity is made, generated, produced, or transmitted by a private person or private corporation on or through private property solely for its own use or the use of tenants of its building and not for sale to or for the use of others.”